Nevada, session 83, SB271.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Division of Public and Behavioral Health of the
Department of Health and Human Services the sum of $12,000,000
for carrying out a nurse apprentice program.
2. Money appropriated by subsection 1 may be:
(a) Granted to another entity to carry out the program.
(b) Used only for:
(1) Reimbursement of a health care entity that is enrolled in
the program for:
(I) Compensation paid by the health care entity to each
nurse apprentice who participates in the program and is employed
by the health care entity;
-
*SB271*

– 2 –
(II) The costs of supervising each nurse apprentice who
participates in the program and is employed by the health care
entity; and
(III) Retention bonuses paid by the health care entity to
each nurse apprentice who participates in the program and enters
into an employment agreement with the health care entity upon
graduation and licensure;
(2) Travel expenses incurred by a nurse apprentice who
participates in the program and resides more than 50 miles from his
or her employing health care entity; and
(3) Administrative costs to carry out the program, except not
more than $500,000 of the money appropriated by subsection 1 may
be used for this purpose.
3. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Health care entity” means:
(1) A medical facility;
(2) A community health clinic; or
(3) A health maintenance organization.
(b) “Nurse apprentice” means a nursing student who performs
tasks that he or she has successfully demonstrated in his or her
program of education in accordance with regulations adopted by the
State Board of Nursing.
(c) “Nursing student” means a person who is:
(1) Enrolled in a program of professional nursing or practical
nursing at an accredited school of nursing;
(2) Taking at least three credits of nursing theory or clinical
courses related to nursing in an academic semester; and
(3) Continuously progressing toward obtaining a certificate
or degree in nursing.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
H
-
*SB271*